apertium-pl-cs.pl.dix
    <pardef n="PBASE__śpioch_pl">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__Marek">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kowi</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiem</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__mp_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__Rysiek">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siek</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śka</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śkowi</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śka</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śku</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śkiem</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śku</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śk</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__mp_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Piotr/ek__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="dim"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__Marek"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ry/siek__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>siek<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__Rysiek"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__Wayne">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e'a</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e'owi</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eowi</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e'a</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e'm</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Wayn/e__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__Wayne"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e'</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__mp_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__wojsko">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__wojsko_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__wojsko_pl"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wojsk/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wojsko"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Broumovsk/o__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wojsko"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="San_Francisco__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="UE__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jabł/ko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__wojsko_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiem</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__wojsko_pl"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="autko"><i>aut</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bagnisko"><i>bagnisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciałko"><i>ciał</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cielątko"><i>cieląt</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciemiączko"><i>ciemiącz</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dzwonko"><i>dzwon</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="embargo"><i>embarg</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiasko"><i>fiask</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kazanko"><i>kazan</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kowadełko"><i>kowadeł</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kretowisko"><i>kretowisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kąpielisko"><i>kąpielisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="letnisko"><i>letnisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lodowisko"><i>lodowisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lusterko"><i>luster</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lwiątko"><i>lwiąt</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manko"><i>mank</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mrowisko"><i>mrowisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="niewiniątko"><i>niewiniąt</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okienko"><i>okien</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pisemko"><i>pisem</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piórko"><i>piór</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poletko"><i>polet</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pośmiewisko"><i>pośmiewisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prawko"><i>praw</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prosiątko"><i>prosiąt</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radełko"><i>radeł</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rokoko"><i>rokok</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sago"><i>sag</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serduszko"><i>serdusz</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrzydełko"><i>skrzydeł</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="składowisko"><i>składowisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stadko"><i>stad</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szkiełko"><i>szkieł</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="słoneczko"><i>słonecz</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="słówko"><i>słów</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tango"><i>tang</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="targowisko"><i>targowisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udko"><i>ud</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urwisko"><i>urwisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ziarenko"><i>ziaren</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="światełko"><i>świateł</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="babsko"><i>babsk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pisanko"><i>pisan</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="przytulisko"><i>przytulisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozlewisko"><i>rozlewisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="państewko"><i>państew</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stoisko"><i>stoisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wieko"><i>wiek</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pastwisko"><i>pastwisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polanko"><i>polan</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="przezwisko"><i>przezwisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wykopalisko"><i>wykopalisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zwałowisko"><i>zwałowisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="żako"><i>żak</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="znalezisko"><i>znalezisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miasteczko"><i>miastecz</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boisko"><i>boisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grodzisko"><i>grodzisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="logo"><i>log</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lotnisko"><i>lotnisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nazwisko"><i>nazwisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ryzyko"><i>ryzyk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stanowisko"><i>stanowisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wojsko"><i>wojsk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jabłko Adama"><i>jabł</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/><p><l><b/>Adama</l><r><g><b/>Adama</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="biurko"><i>biur</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jajko"><i>jaj</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sitko"><i>sit</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="żółtko"><i>żółt</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ognisko"><i>ognisk</i><par n="wojsk/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="łóżko"><i>łóż</i><par n="jabł/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Piotrek"><i>Piotr</i><par n="Piotr/ek__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pawełek"><i>Paweł</i><par n="Piotr/ek__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rysiek"><i>Ry</i><par n="Ry/siek__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Stasiek"><i>Sta</i><par n="Ry/siek__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Broumovsko"><i>Broumovsk</i><par n="Broumovsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Broumovsko" r="LR"><p><l>Broumowsk</l><r>Broumovsk</r></p><par n="Broumovsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Chodsko"><i>Chodsk</i><par n="Broumovsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Uhersko"><i>Uhersk</i><par n="Broumovsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mokrsko"><i>Mokrsk</i><par n="Broumovsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="San Francisco"><i>San<b/>Francisco</i><par n="San_Francisco__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Schengen"><i>Schengen</i><par n="San_Francisco__np"/></e>
    <e lm="UE"><i>UE</i><par n="UE__np"/></e>
    <e lm="USA"><i>USA</i><par n="UE__np"/></e>
    <e lm="U.S."><i>U.S.</i><par n="UE__np"/></e>
